Illinois, session 104th, SB2327.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7)7    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 8    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 9record that contains information that is exempt from 10disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 11that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 12to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 13shall make the remaining information available for inspection 14and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 15be exempt from inspection and copying: 16        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 17    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 18    regulations implementing federal or State law. 19        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 20    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 21    or a court order. 22        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 23    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and   SB2327- 2 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    specifically designed to provide information to one or 2    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 3    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 4        (c) Personal information contained within public 5    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 6    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 7    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 8    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 9    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 10    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 11    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 12    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 13    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 14    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 15    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 16    privacy. 17        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 18    created in the course of administrative enforcement 19    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 20    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 21    extent that disclosure would: 22            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 23        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 24        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 25        agency that is the recipient of the request; 26            (ii) interfere with active administrative   SB2327- 3 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 2        that is the recipient of the request; 3            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 4        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 5        hearing; 6            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 7        confidential source, confidential information 8        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 9        who file complaints with or provide information to 10        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 11        penal agencies; except that the identities of 12        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 13        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 14        local government, except when disclosure would 15        interfere with an active criminal investigation 16        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 17        request; 18            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 19        techniques other than those generally used and known 20        or disclose internal documents of correctional 21        agencies related to detection, observation, or 22        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 23        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 24        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 25        request; 26            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law   SB2327- 4 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 2            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 3        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 4        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 5    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 6    record management system if the law enforcement agency 7    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 8    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 9    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 10    access to the record through the shared electronic record 11    management system. 12        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 13    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 14    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 15    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 16    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 17    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 18    Board. 19        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 20    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 21    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 22        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 23    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 24        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 25    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 26    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those   SB2327- 5 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    materials are available in the library of the correctional 2    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 3    confined. 4        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 5    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 6    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 7    materials include records from staff members' personnel 8    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 9    information. 10        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 13    through an administrative request to the Department of 14    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 15    Mental Health. 16        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 19    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 20    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 21    institution or facility.22        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 23    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 24    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 25    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 26    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited   SB2327- 6 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 2    or school address, work telephone number, social security 3    number, or any other identifying information, except as 4    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 5    or claim. 6        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 7    requested by a person committed to the Department of 8    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 9    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 10    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 11    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 12    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 13    claim. 14        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 15    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 16    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 17    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 18    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 19    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 20    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 21    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 22    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 23        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 24    information obtained from a person or business where the 25    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 26    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary,   SB2327- 7 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 2    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 3    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 4    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 5    requested.6        The information included under this exemption includes 7    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 8    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 9    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 10    company within the investment portfolio of a private 11    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 12    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 13    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 14    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 15    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 16    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 17    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 18    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 19    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 20    privately held company may cause competitive harm.21        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 22    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 23    to disclosure. 24        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 25    agreement, including information which if it were 26    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage   SB2327- 8 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 2    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 3    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 4    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 5    award or final selection is made. 6        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 7    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 8    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 9    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 10    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 11    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 12    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 13    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 14    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 15    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 16    legal rights of the general public. 17        (j) The following information pertaining to 18    educational matters:19            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 20        examination data used to administer an academic 21        examination; 22            (ii) information received by a primary or 23        secondary school, college, or university under its 24        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 25        their academic peers; 26            (iii) information concerning a school or   SB2327- 9 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 2        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 3        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and4            (iv) course materials or research materials used 5        by faculty members. 6        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 7    submissions, and other construction related technical 8    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 9    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 10    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 11    including, but not limited to, power generating and 12    distribution stations and other transmission and 13    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 14    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 15    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 16    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 17    security. 18        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 19    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 20    public body makes the minutes available to the public 21    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 22        (m) Communications between a public body and an 23    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 24    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 25    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 26    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative   SB2327- 10 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 2    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 3    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 4        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 5    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 6    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 7    cases in which discipline is imposed. 8        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 9    with automated data processing operations, including, but 10    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 11    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 12    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 13    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 14    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 15    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 16    security of the system or its data or the security of 17    materials exempt under this Section. 18        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 19    between public bodies and their employees or 20    representatives, except that any final contract or 21    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 22        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 23    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 24    an applicant for a license or employment. 25        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 26    to real estate purchase negotiations until those   SB2327- 11 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 2    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 3    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 4    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 5    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 6    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 7    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 8    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 9    until a sale is consummated. 10        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 11    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 12    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 13    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 14    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 15    intergovernmental risk management association or 16    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 17    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 18        (t) Information contained in or related to 19    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 20    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 21    for the regulation or supervision of financial 22    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 23    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 24    law. 25        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 26    the disclosure of secret or confidential information,   SB2327- 12 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 2    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 3    Electronic Transactions Act. 4        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 5    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 6    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 7    community's population or systems, facilities, or 8    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 9    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 10    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 11    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 12    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 13    include such things as details pertaining to the 14    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 15    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 16    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 17        (w) (Blank). 18        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 19    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 20    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 21    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 22    Illinois Power Agency. 23        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 24    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 25    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 26    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities   SB2327- 13 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 2    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 3    Commission. 4        (z) Information about students exempted from 5    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 6    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 7    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 8    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 9    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 10        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 11    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 12        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 13    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 14    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 15    Mortality Review Team Act. 16        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 17    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 18    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 19    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.20        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 21    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 22    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 23    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 24        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 25    information of persons who are minors and are also 26    participants and registrants in programs of park   SB2327- 14 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 2    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 3    associations.4        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 5    information of participants and registrants in programs of 6    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 7    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 8    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 9    minors.10        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 11    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 12    2012. 13        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 14    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 15    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 16    School Code and any information contained in that report. 17        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 18    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 19    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 20    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 21    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 22    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 23    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 24    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 25    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 26    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of   SB2327- 15 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    Corrections.2        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 3    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 4        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 5    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 6    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 7    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 8    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 9    of a governmental entity or a person. 10        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 11    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 12    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 13    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 14    the procedure.15        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 16    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 17    Confidential Reporting Act. 18        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 19    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 20    Act. 21        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 22    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 23        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 24    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 25    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 26    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological   SB2327- 16 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 2    Act.3        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 4    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 5        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 6    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 7        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 8    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 9    protected health information, including demographic 10    information, that may be contained within or extracted 11    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 12    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 13    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 14    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 15    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 16    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 17    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 18    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 19    160.103. 20        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 21    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 22    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 23    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 24        (uu) Confidential information and records described in 25    subsection (i) of Section 46 of the Children and Family 26    Services Act.   SB2327- 17 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 2Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 3prior to disclosure under this Act. 4    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 5public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 6agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 7behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 8governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 9Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 10for purposes of this Act. 11    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 12information or limit the availability of records to the 13public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 14in this Act. 15(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 171-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 18eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 19103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 208-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 21eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 22    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 23by adding Section 46 as follows: 24    (20 ILCS 505/46 new)  SB2327- 18 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    Sec. 46. Office of Independent Cultural Ombudsman.2    (a) Purpose. The purpose of this Section is to create 3within the Department of Children and Family Services the 4Office of Independent Cultural Ombudsman for the purpose of 5securing the rights of youth and families that are subject to 6investigation, collaboration, or other correspondence with the 7Department of Children and Family Services.8    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section:9    "Immediate family or household member" means the spouse, 10child, parent, brother, sister, grandparent, or grandchild, 11whether of the whole blood or half blood or by adoption or 12permanent placement, or a person who shares a common dwelling.13    "Office" means the Office of the Independent Cultural 14Ombudsman.15    "Ombudsman" means the Department of Children and Family 16Services Independent Cultural Ombudsman.17    (c) Appointment of Independent Cultural Ombudsman. The 18Governor shall appoint the Independent Cultural Ombudsman with 19the advice and consent of the Senate for a term of 4 years, 20with the first term expiring February 1, 2028. A person 21appointed as Ombudsman may be reappointed to one or more 22subsequent terms. A vacancy shall occur upon resignation, 23death, or removal. The Ombudsman may only be removed by the 24Governor for incompetency, malfeasance, neglect of duty, or 25conviction of a felony. If the Senate is not in session or is 26in recess when an appointment subject to its confirmation is   SB2327- 19 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1made, the Governor shall make a temporary appointment which 2shall be subject to subsequent Senate approval. The Ombudsman 3may employ deputies to perform, under the direction of the 4Ombudsman, the same duties and exercise the same powers as the 5Ombudsman, and may employ other support staff as deemed 6necessary. The Ombudsman and deputies must:7        (1) be over the age of 21 years;8        (2) have a bachelor's degree or advanced degree from 9    an accredited college or university;10        (3) have relevant expertise in areas such as the 11    workings of the Department, investigations, or civil 12    rights advocacy as evidenced by experience in the field or 13    by academic background; and14        (4) have relevant expertise in matters concerning 15    cultural awareness and advocacy as evidenced by experience 16    in the field or by academic background.17    (d) Conflicts of interest. A person may not serve as 18Ombudsman or as a deputy if the person or the person's 19immediate family or household member:20        (1) is or has been employed by the Department within 21    one year prior to appointment, other than as Ombudsman or 22    Deputy Ombudsman;23        (2) participates in the management of a business 24    entity or other organization receiving funds from the 25    Department;26        (3) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, any   SB2327- 20 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    interest in a business entity or other organization 2    receiving funds from the Department;3        (4) uses or receives any amount of tangible goods, 4    services, or funds from the Department, other than as 5    Ombudsman or Deputy Ombudsman; or6        (5) is required to register as a lobbyist for an 7    organization that interacts with the Department or any 8    related entities.9    (e) Duties and powers.10        (1) The Independent Cultural Ombudsman shall function 11    independently within the Department with respect to the 12    operations of the Office in performance of his or her 13    duties under this Section and shall report to the 14    Governor. The Ombudsman shall adopt rules and standards as 15    may be necessary or desirable to carry out his or her 16    duties. Funding for the Office shall be designated 17    separately within Department funds. The Department shall 18    provide necessary administrative services and facilities 19    to the Office of the Independent Cultural Ombudsman.20        (2) The Office of the Independent Cultural Ombudsman 21    shall have the following duties:22            (A) Review and monitor the implementation of the 23        rules and standards established by the Department and 24        evaluate the delivery of services to youth and 25        families to ensure that the rights of youth and 26        families are fully observed.  SB2327- 21 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1            (B) Provide assistance to a youth or family who 2        the Ombudsman determines is in need of assistance, 3        including advocating with an agency, provider, or 4        other person in the best interests of the youth.5            (C) Investigate and attempt to resolve complaints 6        made by or on behalf of youth, other than complaints 7        alleging criminal behavior or violations of the State 8        Officials and Employee Ethics Act, if the Office 9        determines that the investigation and resolution would 10        further the purpose of the Office, and:11                (i) a youth or youth's family is in need of 12            assistance from the Office; or13                (ii) a systemic issue in the Department's 14            provision of services is raised by a complaint.15            (D) Review and inspect periodically the facilities 16        and procedures of any facility or placement in which a 17        youth has been placed by the Department to ensure that 18        the rights of youth are fully observed.19            (E) Be accessible to and meet confidentially and 20        regularly with youth and families and serve as a 21        resource by informing them of pertinent laws, rules, 22        and policies, and their rights thereunder.23        (3) The following cases shall be reported immediately 24    to the Director of Children and Family Services and the 25    Governor:26            (A) Cases of severe abuse or injury of a youth or   SB2327- 22 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1        the youth's family.2            (B) Serious misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, 3        or serious violations of policies and procedures 4        concerning the administration of a Department program 5        or operation.6            (C) Serious problems concerning the delivery of 7        services in a facility operated by or under contract 8        with the Department.9            (D) Interference by the Department with an 10        investigation conducted by the Office.11            (E) Other cases as deemed necessary by the 12        Ombudsman.13        (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 14    Ombudsman may not investigate alleged criminal behavior or 15    violations of the State Officials and Employees Ethics 16    Act. If the Ombudsman determines that a possible criminal 17    act has been committed, or that special expertise is 18    required in the investigation, he or she shall immediately 19    notify the Illinois State Police. If the Ombudsman 20    determines that a possible violation of the State 21    Officials and Employees Ethics Act has occurred, he or she 22    shall immediately refer the incident to the Office of the 23    Governor's Executive Inspector General for investigation. 24    If the Ombudsman receives a complaint from a youth or 25    third party regarding suspected abuse or neglect of a 26    child, the Ombudsman shall refer the incident to the Child   SB2327- 23 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    Abuse and Neglect Hotline or to the Illinois State Police 2    as mandated by the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 3    Act. All investigations conducted by the Ombudsman shall 4    be conducted in a manner designed to ensure the 5    preservation of evidence for possible use in a criminal 6    prosecution.7        (5) In performance with his or her duties, the 8    Ombudsman may:9            (A) review court files of youth or family members;10            (B) recommend policies, rules, and legislation 11        designed to protect youth and foster awareness and 12        education about cultural diversity and sensitivities;13            (C) make appropriate referrals under any of the 14        duties and powers listed in this subsection;15            (D) attend internal administrative and 16        disciplinary hearings to ensure the rights of youth, 17        particularly as it pertains to the recognition and 18        observance of their culture or religion, are fully 19        observed and advocate for the best interest of youth 20        when deemed necessary; and21            (E) perform other acts, otherwise permitted or 22        required by law, in furtherance of the purpose of the 23        Office.24        (6) To assess if a youth's rights have been violated 25    or if the youth was subject to behavior or procedures that 26    were incompatible with the youth's culture or religion,   SB2327- 24 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    the Ombudsman may, in any matter that does not involve 2    alleged criminal behavior, contact or consult with an 3    administrator, employee, youth, parent, expert, or any 4    other individual in the course of his or her investigation 5    or to secure information as necessary to fulfill his or 6    her duties.7    (f) Duties of the Department.8        (1) The Department shall allow any youth or family 9    member to communicate with the Ombudsman or a deputy at 10    any time and ensure that families are aware of the 11    existence of the Ombudsman as a resource. The 12    communication:13            (A) may be in person, by phone, by mail, or by any 14        other means deemed appropriate in light of security 15        concerns; and16            (B) is confidential and privileged.17        (2) The Department shall allow the Ombudsman and 18    deputies full and unannounced access to youth and 19    Department facilities at any time. The Department shall 20    furnish the Ombudsman and deputies with appropriate 21    meeting space in each facility in order to preserve 22    confidentiality.23        (3) The Department shall allow the Ombudsman and 24    deputies to participate in professional development 25    opportunities provided by the Department as practical and 26    to attend appropriate professional training when requested   SB2327- 25 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    by the Ombudsman.2        (4) The Department shall provide the Ombudsman copies 3    of critical incident reports involving a youth residing in 4    a facility operated by the Department. Critical incidents 5    include, but are not limited to, severe injuries that 6    result in hospitalization, suicide attempts that required 7    medical intervention, or sexual abuse.8        (5) The Department shall provide the Ombudsman with 9    reasonable advance notice of all internal administrative 10    and disciplinary hearings regarding a youth residing in a 11    facility operated by the Department.12        (6) The Department may not discharge, demote, 13    discipline, or in any manner discriminate or retaliate 14    against a youth or an employee who in good faith makes a 15    complaint to the Office of the Independent Cultural 16    Ombudsman or cooperates with the Office.17    (g) Reports. The Independent Cultural Ombudsman shall 18provide to the General Assembly and the Governor, no later 19than January 1 of each year, a summary of activities done in 20furtherance of the purpose of the Office for the prior fiscal 21year. The summaries shall contain data both aggregated and 22disaggregated by individual facility and describe:23        (1) the work of the Ombudsman;24        (2) the status of any review or investigation 25    undertaken by the Ombudsman, but may not contain any 26    confidential or identifying information concerning the   SB2327- 26 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1    subjects or the reports and investigations; and2        (3) any recommendations that the Independent Cultural 3    Ombudsman has relating to a systemic issue in the 4    Department's provision of services and any other matters 5    for consideration by the General Assembly and the 6    Governor.7    (h) Complaints. The Office of the Independent Cultural 8Ombudsman shall promptly and efficiently act on complaints 9made by or on behalf of youth or families filed with the Office 10that relate to the operations or staff of the Department. The 11Office shall maintain information about parties to the 12complaint, the subject matter of the complaint, a summary of 13the results of the review or investigation of the complaint, 14including any resolution of or recommendations made as a 15result of the complaint. The Office shall make information 16available describing its procedures for complaint 17investigation and resolution. When applicable, the Office 18shall notify the complaining youth or family that an 19investigation and resolution may result in or will require 20disclosure of the complaining youth's identity. The Office 21shall periodically notify the complaint parties of the status 22of the complaint until final disposition.23    (i) Confidentiality. The name, address, or other 24personally identifiable information of a person who files a 25complaint with the Office, information generated by the Office 26related to a complaint or other activities of the Office, and   SB2327- 27 -LRB104 10587 KTG 20663 b1confidential records obtained by the Office are not subject to 2disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act. The Office 3shall disclose the records only if required by court order on a 4showing of good cause.5    (j) Promotion and awareness of Office. The Independent 6Cultural Ombudsman shall promote awareness among the public, 7youth, and families of:8        (1) the rights of youth and families as they interact 9    with the Department;10        (2) the purpose of the Office;11        (3) how the Office may be contacted;12        (4) the confidential nature of communications;13        (5) the services the Office provides; and14        (6) additional resources available to the public, 15    youth, and families. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.